Massachusetts, session 194th, H681.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as most recently amended by section 219 of chapter 238
of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by adding the following section:-
Section 102. (a) School councils established in section 59C shall hold meetings for
parents and guardians of students in grades K through 12 to discuss their child’s well-being. The
timeframe of the meetings shall include, but not be limited to: (i) 1 meeting within the first 12
weeks of the school year and (ii) 1 meeting within the first 8 weeks after the new year break of
the school year.
(b) School councils shall provide a packet with information for parents and guardians at
the meetings on how to manage their child’s wellbeing at home including, but not limited to,
information on: (i) spotting depression or aggressive thoughts by a student; and (ii) ways to
combat future violence by students. Students shall be provided with a packet to be brought home
for parents and guardians during both meeting timeframes in subsection (a).
of 2

(c) School councils shall hold in-person trainings for parents and guardians at the
meetings on how to manage their child's wellbeing at home.
(d) The department of elementary and secondary education shall assist school councils
with preparing and making available the packet and in-person training for parents or guardians
on how to manage their child's wellbeing at home.
of 2